Montana, session 2025, HB272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Legislative bill drafting files -- privileged content -- definitions. (1)
Legislative bill drafting files are public records as defined in 2-6-1002 and must be provided upon request
pursuant to Title 2, chapter 6, part 10.
(2) A legislative bill drafting file contains the history of the drafting, preparation, and process from
request to introduction of a bill draft. The contents of a bill drafting file may include but are not limited to:
(a) draft versions of a bill prior to introduction;
(b) bills or laws from other states;
(c) uniform acts or model legislation from any source;
(d) reports, articles, papers, or any other research conducted on the topic of the bill draft;
(e) legal analysis;
(f) e-mails and other communications between the legislator and the bill drafter;
(g) e-mails and other communications between the bill drafter and any third party, whether or not
the legislator was included in those communications; and
(h) any other resources or materials collected or compiled during the course of drafting the bill.
(3) (a) The legislative privilege granted under Article V, section 8, of the Montana constitution to a
legislator is an immunity from prosecution in a criminal or civil action for the legislator's legitimate legislative
acts. The records, including communications, contained in a legislative bill drafting file may not be used as
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 272

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 272.1
evidence of legislative acts in a judicial proceeding against a legislator.
(b) The legislative privilege granted under Article V, section 8, of the Montana constitution to a
legislator as it pertains to legislative bill drafting files does not create a privilege of confidentiality against
disclosure under Article II, section 9, of the Montana constitution and Title 2, chapter 6, parts 10 through 12, for
any communications or other records that are generated in the course of drafting a bill, shared with another
person, or preserved in the legislative bill drafting file.
(c) A legislator is entitled to assert legislative privilege to prohibit disclosure of writings or
documents that are kept private by the legislator and not shared with another person. A legislator waives that
privilege if the legislator voluntarily provides the writings or documents related to a bill drafting file to another
person.
(d) A legislator is entitled to assert legislative privilege to prohibit disclosure of communications or
documents that are exchanged between the legislator and the legislator's personal staff when the legislator has
an expectation of privacy. A legislator waives that privilege if the legislator voluntarily provides communications
or documents related to a bill drafting file to a third party.
(e) Legislative privilege does not apply to communications between a legislator and chamber staff
or legislative branch staff and does not prevent those communications from being disclosed pursuant to a
public records request because the chamber staff and legislative branch staff are employed by the legislature in
its entirety and not by an individual legislator.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Chamber staff" means the staff of the house of representatives and the staff of the senate as
provided for in 5-2-221 and legislative rules.
(b) "Legislative branch staff" means the staff of the:
(i) legislative services division provided for in 5-11-111;
(ii) legislative fiscal division provided for in 5-12-301; and
(iii) legislative audit division provided for in 5-13-301.
(c) "Personal staff" means a legislative aide employed by an individual legislator and designated
pursuant to legislative rules.

- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 272

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 272.1
NEW SECTION. Section 2. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are
severable from the invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications,
the part remains in effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 2, chapter 6, part 10, and the provisions of Title 2, chapter 6, part 10, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 272